California statutes. Education Code
(1) The date upon which the school district will begin accepting and processing interdistrict transfer requests for the subsequent school year.

(2) The reasons for which the school district may approve or deny a request, and any information or documents that must be submitted as supporting evidence.

(3) If applicable, the process and timelines by which a denial of a request may be appealed within the school district before the school district renders a final decision.

(4) That failure of the parent to meet any timelines established by the school district shall be deemed an abandonment of the request.

(5) Applicable timelines for processing a request, including statements that the school district shall do both of the following:

(A) Notify a parent submitting a current year request, as defined in
 Section 46600.1, of its final decision within 30 calendar days from the date the request was received.

(B) Notify a parent submitting a future year request, as defined in Section 46600.1, of its final decision as soon as possible, but no later than 14 calendar days after the commencement of instruction in the school year for which interdistrict transfer is sought.

(6) The conditions under which an existing interdistrict transfer permit may be revoked or rescinded.

(b) A school district that denies a request for an interdistrict transfer shall advise the parent, in writing, of the right to appeal to the county board of education within 30 calendar days from the date of the final denial.

(c) Any written notice to parents regarding a school district’s decision on a request for interdistrict transfer shall conform to the translation requirements of Section 48985 and may be provided using any of the following methods:

(1) Regular mail.

(2) Electronic format, if the parent provides an email address.

(3) By any other method normally used to communicate with parents in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 550, Sec. 3.   (AB 2826)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

46601.

(a) A parent may appeal a school district’s decision regarding a request for interdistrict transfer, within 30 calendar days of the date of the school district’s final denial, to the county board of education.

(b) (1) Failure by the parent to appeal within the required time is good cause for rejection of an appeal. An appeal shall be accepted only upon verification by the county board of education’s designee that appeals within the school districts have been exhausted within the timelines provided pursuant to Section 46600.2. If new evidence or grounds for the request are introduced, the county board
 of education may remand the matter for further consideration by the school district or districts. In all other cases, the appeal shall be granted or denied on its merits.

(2) (A) (i) The county board of education shall, unless clause (ii) applies, within 30 calendar days after the appeal is filed, determine whether the pupil should be permitted to attend the school district of proposed enrollment and the applicable period of attendance.

(ii) The county board of education in a class 1 or class 2 county may extend the time period to up to 60 calendar days after the appeal is filed to determine whether the pupil should be permitted to attend the school district of proposed enrollment and the applicable period of attendance, if one or more of the following circumstances apply:

(I) A delay in response by the parent, guardian, educational rights holder, or school district.

(II) A delay due to incompatible availability for the factfinding hearing of the parent, guardian, educational rights holder, or school district.

(III) A request to delay a factfinding hearing or board hearing by the parent, guardian, or educational rights holder, or an inability of the parent, guardian, or educational rights holder to attend a factfinding hearing or board hearing.

(IV) A school district has closed their annual application window and is no longer accepting permit applications for the remainder of the current or future school year.

(B) In the event that compliance by the county board of education within the time requirement for determining whether the pupil should be permitted to attend the school district of proposed enrollment is impractical, the county board of education or the county superintendent of schools, for good cause, may extend the time period for up to an additional five schooldays. The county board of education shall provide adequate notice to all parties of the date and time of any hearing scheduled and of the opportunity to submit written statements and documentation and to be heard on the matter pursuant to rules and regulations adopted by the county board of education in accordance with this chapter. The county board of education’s rules may provide for the granting of continuances upon a showing of good cause. The county board of education shall render a decision within three schooldays of any
 hearing conducted by the county board of education unless the parent requests a postponement.

(C) In a class 1 or class 2 county, the county board of education’s rules may provide for any hearing pursuant to this section to be conducted by a hearing officer pursuant to Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 27720) of Part 3 of Division 2 of Title 3 of the Government Code, or by an impartial administrative panel of three or more certificated persons appointed by the county board of education. Section 27722 of the Government Code applies to a hearing by an impartial administrative panel and, for purposes of this section, the term “hearing officer” in Section 27722 of the Government Code includes an impartial administrative panel. A member of the impartial administrative panel shall not be a member of the county board of education, nor be employed by the school district of residence or the school
 district of proposed enrollment.

(D) If the hearing officer is not authorized to decide whether the pupil should be permitted to attend in the school district of proposed enrollment, the county board of education, within 10 calendar days of receiving the recommended decision pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 27722 of the Government Code, shall render a decision.

(3) The designee of the county superintendent of schools shall investigate to determine whether local remedies in the matter have been exhausted and to provide any additional information deemed useful to the county board of education in reaching a decision.

(4) Pupils who are under consideration for expulsion,
 or who have been expelled pursuant to Sections 48915 and 48918, may not appeal interdistrict attendance denials or rescissions while expulsion proceedings are pending, or during the term of the expulsion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 606, Sec. 1.   (SB 413)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

46602.

(a) If the county board of education determines that the pupil should be permitted to attend the school district of proposed enrollment, the pupil shall be admitted to school in the school district without delay and the attendance may be counted by the school district of enrollment for state apportionment purposes.

(b) Written notice of the decision by the county board of education shall be delivered to the parent and to the governing boards of the school districts. Notice shall conform to the requirements of Section 48985 and may be provided using any of the following methods:

(1) Regular mail.

(2) Electronic format, if the parent provides an email address.

(3) By any other method normally used to communicate with parents in writing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 550, Sec. 5.   (AB 2826)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

46603.

(a) (1) For a period not to exceed two school months, the governing board of a school district of proposed enrollment may provisionally admit to the schools of the school district a pupil who resides in another school district, pending a decision of the governing boards of the two school districts, or by the county board of education upon appeal, regarding the interdistrict attendance. A pupil shall be eligible for provisional attendance only upon providing reasonable evidence that a final decision for a request for interdistrict transfer is pending either with the school district of residence, the school district of proposed enrollment, or the county board of education.

(2) The period of provisional attendance begins on the first day of the pupil’s attendance in the school.

(3) If a decision by the school districts or the county board of education has not been rendered by the conclusion of two school months, and the school districts or the county board of education are still operating within the prescribed timelines, the pupil shall not be allowed to continue attendance at the school district of proposed enrollment. The pupil is subject to compulsory full-time education pursuant to Section 48200 and shall enroll in the school district of residence or in another educational program.

(4) Provisional attendance shall not guarantee that a school district or county board of education will approve a request for interdistrict transfer.

(b) Regardless of whether the decision on interdistrict attendance is allowed, the provisional attendance may be counted by the school district of proposed enrollment for state apportionment purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 550, Sec. 6.   (AB 2826)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

46604.

If the governing board of a school district in which pupils reside who are lawfully attending in another district fails or refuses to pay, when due, the amount required to be paid to the district of attendance for the education of those pupils under any provision of this code, the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district of residence shall draw a requisition against the funds of the district of residence in favor of the district of attendance in payment of that amount and transmit the requisition to the governing board of the district of attendance.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 46612 by Stats. 1986, Ch. 742, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

46606.

(a) A regional occupational program or regional occupational center maintained by a school district, county superintendent of schools, or a regional occupational program or regional occupational center maintained by two or more school districts pursuant to a joint powers or cooperative agreement, may admit pupils who reside outside the attendance area of the regional occupational program or regional occupational center. 

(b) The average daily attendance for attendance of pupils who reside outside of the regional occupational center or program attendance area and are enrolled in a regional occupational center or program pursuant to Section 52317 shall be credited to the regional occupational center or program that incurs the training costs for purposes of determining state apportionments and the revenue limits. 

(c) For purposes of computing the revenue limits for pupils who enroll in a regional occupational center or program outside their district of residence, the regional occupational center or program shall claim its own revenue limit. 

(d) The regional occupational center or program is not eligible for state reimbursement for home-to-school transportation allowances for pupils who are enrolled in the regional occupational center or program pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 64, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

46607.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) or (c), the average daily attendance for attendance of pupils from another district shall be credited to the district of attendance for purposes of determining state apportionments and the revenue limit pursuant to Section 42237 or 42238.

(b) For any district that would have a reduction of 25 percent or more in its federal grant pursuant to Public Law 81-874 if the average daily attendance of pupils residing within the district were credited to the district of attendance, then the average daily attendance resulting from an interdistrict attendance agreement shall be credited to the district of residence and the district of residence shall pay a tuition to the district of attendance no later than the next August 31, after the close of the fiscal year as follows:

(1) For attendance in regular day schools and summer schools the tuition per unit of average daily attendance, if any, shall not exceed the actual cost per unit of average daily attendance for the grade level or program less any income, other than tuition, received by the district of attendance on account of such attendance.

(2) The district in which the pupil resides shall reduce its total revenue limit pursuant to Section 42238 by the total excess, if any, of its revenue limit per unit of average daily attendance multiplied by the total interdistrict attendance over the total tuition to be paid to districts of attendance.

The district in which the pupil resides may increase its total revenue limit pursuant to Section 42238 by the total excess, if any, of the total tuition to be paid to districts of attendance over the district of residence’s revenue limit per unit of average daily attendance multiplied by the total interdistrict average daily attendance.

(c) For any consortium of school districts operating an adult education and a regional occupational program serving four or more school districts, the school districts may agree to claim the unit of average daily attendance on the basis of the district of residence and pay such interdistrict tuition to the district of attendance as agreed to by the participating districts.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 46616 by Stats. 1986, Ch. 742, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

46609.

The governing board of a unified school district, whose boundaries are coterminous with the boundaries of a county, and which is contiguous to an adjoining state, may provide for the education of all or any number of the high school pupils of the district who reside in the district by the attendance of these pupils at the schools of a school district of an adjoining state. The governing board of the unified school district may enter an agreement with the school district of an adjoining state for the education of these pupils, subject to the terms and conditions agreed upon. The provisions of Sections 2000 to 2011, inclusive, do not apply to pupils educated pursuant to an agreement authorized by this section.

The average daily attendance of pupils educated pursuant to an agreement authorized by this section shall be credited to the district of residence for apportionment purposes. The superintendent of schools of the district, or the principal of the school, in the adjoining state attended by the pupils under such an agreement shall, not later than July 2 of each year, certify, to the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the school district of residence of the pupils, the average daily attendance of the pupils of the district attending the schools of the school district in the adjoining state. Certification shall be made on forms furnished by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The county superintendent of schools shall report the average daily attendance to the Superintendent of Public Instruction, who shall include the average daily attendance in his report of average daily attendance in all of the duly established schools of the state for the last preceding school year certified by him to the State Controller.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 46618 by Stats. 1986, Ch. 742, Sec. 17.)
-------------------------------------------

46610.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the Fallbrook Union High School District shall enter into an interdistrict attendance agreement with the Capistrano Unified School District to allow any pupil, at the request of his or her parent or guardian, to attend schools of the Capistrano Unified School District when the pupil resides in the San Onofre housing area of the Marine Corps Base, Camp Joseph H. Pendleton. No more than 150 pupils from the Fallbrook Union High School District may attend school in the Capistrano Unified School District pursuant to this interdistrict attendance agreement.

(2) The Fallbrook Union High School District shall be credited with the
 average daily attendance of these pupils solely for purposes of receiving federal grants pursuant to Public Law 81-874.

(b) The Fallbrook Union High School District shall pay tuition to the Capistrano Unified School District for the attendance of these pupils only in the amount computed pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2), as follows:

(1) Divide the amount of funds paid pursuant to Section 3 of Public Law 81-874 (20 U.S.C. 238) to the Fallbrook Union High School District in the current fiscal year by the average daily attendance of the school district in the current fiscal year.

(2) Multiply the amount in subdivision (a) by the average daily attendance, for the year of attendance for secondary school pupils attending the schools of the Capistrano Unified School District pursuant to Section 46610.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, the amount provided to the Fallbrook Union High School District and the Capistrano Unified School District for the 2012–13 fiscal year pursuant to this section and Section 46111, as these sections read on June 1, 2013, shall be included in the computations made pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.025, paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 42238.03, and paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 42238.03. For purposes of calculating funding pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 42238.03, the school district of residence shall be credited with the 2012–13 fiscal year revenue limit funding received for the pupils reported pursuant to this section after accounting for the amount of tuition paid to the school district of attendance. For purposes of calculating funding pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (e) of Section 42238.03, the school district of attendance shall be credited
 with the average daily attendance of the pupils reported pursuant to this section in the 2012–13 fiscal year, and the tuition received by the school district of residence pursuant to this section and Section 46611, as these sections read on March 1, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 33, Sec. 35.   (SB 859)   Effective June 20, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 26.8. CHARTER SCHOOLS [47600. - 47663.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [47600. - 47604.5.]

47600.

This part shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Charter Schools Act of 1992.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 781, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

47601.

It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this part, to provide opportunities for teachers, parents, pupils, and community members to establish and maintain schools that operate independently from the existing school district structure, as a method to accomplish all of the following:

(a) Improve pupil learning.

(b) Increase learning opportunities for all pupils, with special emphasis on expanded learning experiences for pupils who are identified as academically low achieving.

(c) Encourage the use of different and innovative teaching methods.

(d) Create new professional opportunities for teachers, including the opportunity to be responsible for the learning program at the schoolsite.

(e) Provide parents and pupils with expanded choices in the types of educational opportunities that are available within the public school system.

(f) Hold the schools established under this part accountable for meeting measurable pupil outcomes, and provide the schools with a method to change from rule-based to performance-based accountability systems.

(g) Provide vigorous competition within the public school system to stimulate continual improvements in all public schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 34, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

47602.

(a) (1) In the 1998–99 school year, the maximum total number of charter schools authorized to operate in this state shall be 250. In the 1999–2000 school year, and in each successive school year thereafter, an additional 100 charter schools are authorized to operate in this state each successive school year. For the purposes of implementing this section, the State Board of Education shall assign a number to each charter petition that it grants pursuant to subdivision (j) of Section 47605 or Section 47605.8 and to each charter notice it receives pursuant to this part, based on the chronological order in which the notice is received. Each number assigned by the state board on or after January 1, 2003, shall correspond to a single petition that identifies a charter school that will operate within the geographic and site limitations of this part. The State Board of Education shall develop a numbering system for charter schools that identifies each school associated with a charter and that operates within the existing limit on the number of charter schools that can be approved each year. For purposes of this section, sites that share educational programs and serve similar pupil populations may not be counted as separate schools. Sites that do not share a common educational program shall be considered separate schools for purposes of this section. The limits contained in this paragraph may not be waived by the State Board of Education pursuant to Section 33050 or any other provision of law.

(2) By July 1, 2003, the Legislative Analyst shall, pursuant to the criteria in Section 47616.5, report to the Legislature on the effectiveness of the charter school approach authorized under this part and recommend whether to expand or reduce the annual rate of growth of charter schools authorized pursuant to this section.

(b) No charter shall be granted under this part that authorizes the conversion of any private school to a charter school. No charter school shall receive any public funds for a pupil if the pupil also attends a private school that charges the pupil’s family for tuition. The State Board of Education shall adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1058, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

47603.

(a) This part shall not be construed to prohibit any private person or organization from providing funding or other assistance to the establishment or operation of a charter school.

(b) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 54) and added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 38, Sec. 55.   (SB 1016)   Effective June 27, 2012.   Section operative July 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

47604.

(a) A charter school may elect to operate as, or be operated by, a nonprofit public benefit corporation, formed and organized pursuant to the Nonprofit Public Benefit Corporation Law (Part 2 (commencing with Section 5110) of Division 2 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code).

(b) (1) On and after July 1, 2019, a petitioner that submits a charter petition or a charter school that submits a charter renewal or material revision application shall not operate as, or be operated by, a for-profit corporation, a for-profit educational management organization, or a for-profit charter management organization. For purposes of this section, a for-profit educational management organization and a for-profit charter management organization
 are entities that manage or operate a charter school.

(2) (A) “Operate as, or be operated by,” as referenced in paragraph (1), means services provided by a for-profit corporation to a charter school that include any of the following:

(i) Nominating, appointing, or removing board members or officers of the charter school.

(ii) Employing, supervising, or dismissing employees of the charter school, including certificated and noncertificated school personnel.

(iii) Managing the charter school’s day-to-day operations as its administrative manager.

(iv) Approving, denying, or managing the budget or any expenditures of the charter school that are not authorized by the
 governing body of the charter school.

(v) Providing services to a charter school before the governing body of the charter school has approved the contract for those services at a publicly noticed meeting.

(B) A charter school shall not enter into a subcontract to avoid the requirements of this paragraph.

(c) A chartering authority that grants a charter to a charter school to be operated as or by a nonprofit public benefit corporation shall be entitled to a single representative on the board of directors of the nonprofit public benefit corporation.

(d) A chartering authority that grants a charter to a charter school to be operated as or by a nonprofit public benefit corporation is not liable for the debts or obligations of the charter school or for
 claims arising from the performance of acts, errors, or omissions by the charter school if the chartering authority has complied with all oversight responsibilities required by law, including, but not limited to, those required by Section 47604.32 and subdivision (m) of Section 47605.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2019.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   (AB 406)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2019, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

47604.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, an “entity managing a charter school” means a nonprofit public benefit corporation that operates a charter school consistent with Section 47604. An entity that is not authorized to operate a charter school pursuant to Section 47604 is not an “entity managing a charter school” solely because it contracts with a charter school to provide to that charter school goods or task-related services that are performed at the direction of the governing body of the charter school and for which the governing body retains ultimate decisionmaking authority.

(b) A charter school and an entity managing a charter school shall be subject to all of the following:

(1) The Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), except that a charter school operated by an entity pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 47620) shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) regardless of the authorizing entity.

(2) (A) The California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(B) (i) The chartering authority of a charter school shall be the custodian of records with regard to any request for
 information submitted to the charter school if either of the following apply:

(I) The charter school is located on a federally recognized California Indian reservation or rancheria.

(II) The charter school is operated by a nonprofit public benefit corporation that was formed on or before May 31, 2002, and is currently operated by a federally recognized California Indian tribe.

(ii) This subparagraph does not allow a chartering authority to delay or obstruct access to records otherwise required under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(3) Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090)
 of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(4) (A) The Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code).

(B) For purposes of Section 87300 of the Government Code, a charter school and an entity managing a charter school shall be considered an agency and is the most decentralized level for purposes of adopting a conflict-of-interest code.

(c) (1) (A) The governing body of one charter school shall meet within the physical boundaries of the county in which the charter school is located.

(B) A two-way teleconference location shall be
 established at each schoolsite.

(2) (A) The governing body of one nonclassroom-based charter school that does not have a facility or operates one or more resource centers shall meet within the physical boundaries of the county in which the greatest number of pupils who are enrolled in that charter school reside.

(B) A two-way teleconference location shall be established at each resource center.

(3) (A) For a governing body of an entity managing one or more charter schools located within the same county, the governing body of the entity managing a charter school shall meet within the physical boundaries of the county in which that charter school or schools are located.

(B) A two-way teleconference location shall be established at each schoolsite and each resource center.

(4) (A) For a governing body of an entity that manages two or more charter schools that are not located in the same county, the governing body of the entity managing the charter schools shall meet within the physical boundaries of the county in which the greatest number of pupils enrolled in those charter schools managed by that entity reside.

(B) A two-way teleconference location shall be established at each schoolsite and each resource center.

(C) The governing body of the entity managing the charter schools shall audio record, video
 record, or both, all the governing board meetings and post the recordings on each charter school’s internet website.

(5) This subdivision does not limit the authority of the governing body of a charter school and an entity managing a charter school to meet outside the boundaries described in this subdivision if authorized by Section 54954 of the Government Code, and the meeting place complies with Section 54961 of the Government Code.

(d) Notwithstanding Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, an employee of a charter school shall not be disqualified from serving as a member of the governing body of the charter school because of that employee’s employment status. A member of the governing body of a charter
 school who is also an employee of the charter school shall abstain from voting on, or influencing or attempting to influence another member of the governing body regarding, all matters uniquely affecting that member’s employment.

(e) To the extent a governing body of a charter school or an entity managing a charter school engages in activities that are unrelated to a charter school, Article 4 (commencing with Section 1090) of Chapter 1 of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000)
 of Title 1 of the Government Code), and the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code) shall not apply with regard to those unrelated activities unless otherwise required by law.

(f) A meeting of the governing body of a charter school to discuss items related to the operation of the charter school shall not include the discussion of any item regarding an activity of the governing body that is unrelated to the operation of the charter school.

(g) The requirements of this section shall not be waived by the state board pursuant to Section 33050 or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 69.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

47604.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, “entity managing a charter school” has the same meaning as described in subdivision (a) of Section 47604.1.

(b) (1) There may be submitted to the governing body of a charter school attended by high school pupils, or to the governing body of an entity managing multiple charter schools including a charter school attended by high school pupils, a pupil petition requesting the governing body of the charter school or the governing body of the entity managing multiple charter schools, as appropriate, to appoint one or more pupil members to the appropriate governing body pursuant to this section.

(2) The petition shall contain the signatures of either
 (A) not less than 500 pupils regularly enrolled in the high school of the charter school, or (B) not less than 10 percent of the number of pupils regularly enrolled in the high school of the charter school. If a charter school attended by high school pupils is operated by an entity managing a charter school or managing multiple charter schools, then the petition shall contain the signatures of either (A) not less than 500 pupils regularly enrolled in any of the high schools operated by the entity managing a charter school or multiple charter schools, or (B) not less than 10 percent of the number of pupils regularly enrolled in high schools operated by the entity managing a charter school or multiple charter schools. Each fiscal year, and within 60 days of receipt of a petition for pupil representation, or at its next regularly scheduled meeting if no meeting is held within those 60 days, the governing body of the charter school or of the entity managing multiple charter schools shall order the inclusion
 within the membership of that governing body, in addition to the number of regular members otherwise prescribed, of at least one pupil member. The governing body of the charter school or of the entity managing multiple charter schools may order the inclusion of more than one pupil member.

(3) Upon receipt of a petition for pupil representation, the governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools shall, commencing July 1, 2023, and each year thereafter, order the inclusion within the membership of that governing body, in addition to the number of regular members otherwise prescribed, of at least one pupil member. The governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools may order the inclusion of more than one pupil member. The governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools may appoint a pupil to serve as an alternate pupil member who would
 fulfill all duties and have the same rights as a pupil member if that governing body determines the pupil member is not fulfilling their duties. If the governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools appoints an alternate pupil member, that governing body shall suspend the prior pupil member’s rights and privileges related to service on that governing body.

(4) (A) A pupil member of the governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools shall have preferential voting rights.

(B) Preferential voting, as used in this section, means a formal expression of opinion that is recorded in the minutes and cast before the official vote of the governing body of the charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools. A preferential vote shall not serve in determining the final numerical
 outcome of a vote. No preferential vote shall be solicited on matters subject to closed session discussion.

(5) The governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools may adopt a resolution authorizing the pupil member or members to make motions that may be acted upon by that governing body, except on matters dealing with employer-employee relations pursuant to Chapter 10.7 (commencing with Section 3540) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(6) (A) Each pupil member shall have the right to attend each and all meetings of the governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools, except closed sessions.

(B) (i) Each pupil member shall be appointed to subcommittees of the governing body in the same
 manner as other governing body regular members.

(ii) Each pupil member shall be made aware of the time commitment required to participate in subcommittee meetings and work, and may decline an appointment to a subcommittee.

(iii) Subcommittee meetings may be scheduled in accordance with the availability of all members of the governing body, including each pupil member.

(7) Any pupil selected to serve as a member of the governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools shall be enrolled in high school within the charter school, may be less than 18 years of age, and shall be chosen by the pupils enrolled in high school within the charter school in accordance with policies and procedures prescribed by that governing body. The term of a pupil member shall be one year, commencing on July
 1 of each year, except that the term of a pupil member may be adjusted only in cases where a vacancy occurs or to provide more pupils with an opportunity to serve on the governing body.

(8) (A) A pupil member shall be entitled to the mileage allowance to the same extent as regular governing body members, and may receive compensation, as specified pursuant to subparagraph (B).

(B) The governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools may award a pupil member either or both of the following:

(i) Elective course credit based on the number of equivalent daily instructional minutes for the pupil member’s services provided.

(ii) Monthly financial compensation as determined by the governing body.

(9) (A) A pupil member shall be seated with the regular members of the governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools, and shall be recognized as a full member of that governing body at the meetings, including receiving all open meeting materials presented to the governing body regular members at the same time the materials are presented to the other governing body regular members, being invited to staff briefings of governing body regular members, or being provided a separate staff briefing within the same timeframe as the staff briefing of other governing body regular members, being invited to attend other functions of that governing body, such as forums, meetings with pupils and parents, and other general assemblies, and participating in the questioning of witnesses and the discussion of issues.

(B) A pupil member shall
 also receive all materials received by other governing body regular members between open meetings, except for materials that pertain to closed session items.

(C) (i) The governing body of a charter school or of an entity managing multiple charter schools may authorize the pupil member or members to make restorative justice recommendations that may be considered by the governing body in closed session expulsion hearings. If the governing body authorizes pupil recommendations in expulsion hearings, then notwithstanding subparagraph (B), the governing body shall disclose limited case information that pertains to closed session items to the pupil member or members to allow the pupil member or members to make those recommendations.
